Massachusetts, session 194th, H128.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after Chapter 128A the 
following chapter: 
Chapter 128B: Food Justice Frontline Program 
Section 1. As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise. 
“Department”, the Massachusetts Department of Agricultural Resources. 
“Food Security Job”, any financially compensated work involving food production, food 
distribution, food preparation, or food delivery for food insecure Massachusetts residents. 

of 5 9  “Nonprofit Food Security Organization”, a nonprofit corporation or other nonprofit 
organization that has programs which (1) provide land to low- and moderate-income individuals 
for agricultural production, or (2) has programs which provide Food Security Jobs to low- and 
moderate-income individuals, including, but not limited to, food production jobs, food 
distribution jobs, food preparation jobs, and food delivery jobs. 
“Overburdened Community” means a Census Block Group in Massachusetts that meets 
both of the following criteria: 
(1) Is at or above the 75th statewide percentile for at least 2 of the following 
Environmental Indicators on the most recent available United States Environmental Protection 
Agency’s EJSCREEN Assessment: (a) PM 2.5; (b) Ozone; (c) NATA Diesel PM; (d) NATA 
Cancer Risk; (e) NATA Respiratory Hazard Index; (f) Traffic Proximity; (g) Lead Paint 
Indicator; (h) Superfund Proximity; (i) Risk Management Plan Facilities Proximity; (j) 
Hazardous Waste Proximity; and (k) Wastewater Discharge Indicator; and 
(2) has a median household income, as calculated by the US Census Bureau, that is no 
greater than 80% of the statewide median household income, as calculated by the US Census 
Bureau. 
Section 2. (a) The Department shall create the Food Justice Frontline Program. 
(b) The purpose of the Food Justice Frontline Program is to fund Nonprofit Food Security 
Organizations to enable them to create new Food Security Jobs and provide those jobs to 
individuals living within Overburdened Communities. The Food Justice Frontline Program is 
intended to create jobs as rapidly as possible after the enactment of this Act, in order to 
immediately address the widespread food insecurity throughout Massachusetts. 

of 5 31  (c) The Department shall create an application with which Nonprofit Food Security 
Organizations may apply to receive a financial grant, not to exceed $500,000. This application 
shall be known as the Food Justice Frontline Funding Application. 
(d) No Food Justice Frontline Funding Application shall be considered complete unless 
the applicant: (1) Describes, in detail, the program or programs which the Nonprofit Food 
Security Organization operates that provide land or Food Security Jobs to low-income 
Massachusetts residents; and (2) Describes, in detail, the ways in which the Nonprofit Food 
Security Organization would use funding to create jobs for individuals living within 
Overburdened Communities. 
(e) The Department shall establish regulations and guidelines regarding the process and 
criteria for approval of a Food Justice Frontline Funding Application. These regulations and 
guidelines shall prioritize Nonprofit Food Security Organizations which demonstrate a clear and 
credible plan to use the funding to quickly create Food Security Jobs for individuals living within 
Overburdened Communities. 
(f) Nonprofit Food Security Organizations which receive a financial grant under the Food 
Justice Frontline Program must use the entirety of the financial grant money on programs which 
will create Food Security Jobs for individuals living within Overburdened Communities. These 
jobs must pay an hourly wage of not less than the quotient of one divided by two thousand and 
four hundred (1/2,400), multiplied by the statewide per capita income, as calculated by the 
United States Census Bureau. 
(g) A Nonprofit Food Security Organization may apply for multiple financial grants 
under the Food Justice Frontline Program. 

of 5 53  Section 3. The Department shall have the power enter contracts, hire employees, hire 
contractors, promulgate rules and regulations, levy fines, adjudicate administrative cases, or take 
any other lawful action in order to implement the Food Justice Frontline Program. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 128 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 2E the following section: 
Section 2F. (a) The Department of Transitional Assistance and the Executive Office of 
Housing and Economic Development shall establish a new program designed to increase public 
awareness of the availability of the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, the Healthy 
Incentives Program, and other similar food access programs for low-income Massachusetts 
residents and food insecure Massachusetts residents. In order to carry out this program, the 
Executive Office of Housing and Economic Development shall work with Massachusetts 
residents under the age of eighteen to promote public awareness of the Supplemental Nutrition 
Assistance Program. The Executive Office of Housing and Economic Development shall 
compensate these Massachusetts residents with a stipend of not less than 15 dollars for every 
hour in which they work to promote public awareness of the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 
Program. The Department of Transitional Assistance and the Executive Office of Housing and 
Economic Development shall prioritize working with Massachusetts residents who live in 
Overburdened Communities or Census Block Groups with a median household income that is 
below 80% of the statewide median household income. This program shall be conducted in 
multiple languages in order to ensure that it benefits both English-speaking families and non-
English speaking families. 

of 5 74  (b) The Department of Transitional Assistance and the Executive Office of Housing and 
Economic Development shall apply for any available federal programs including, but not limited 
to, the Food Insecurity Nutrition Incentive Grants administered by the United States Department 
of Agriculture to provide matching benefits to be deposited in the Fund. 
(c) The Department of Transitional Assistance and the Executive Office of Housing and 
Economic Development shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement these programs.